Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF608.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [462.3655] DATA CENTERS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Enterprise data center" means a facility comprised of one or more buildings that are located on a single parcel or on contiguous parcels that: new text end new text begin (1) in aggregate contains more than 800,000 square feet of space that house or support the operation of enterprise information technology equipment; and new text end new text begin (2) has a primary purpose of providing for the storage, management, or processing of digital data. new text end new text begin (c) "Enterprise information technology equipment" means computers and equipment supporting computing, networking, or data storage, including but not limited to cabling and racking systems; cooling systems, cooling towers, and other temperature control infrastructure; and power infrastructure for transformation, distribution, or management of electricity used for the maintenance and operation of a facility, including but not limited to exterior dedicated business-owned substations, backup power generation systems, battery systems, and related infrastructure. new text end new text begin (d) "Industrial district" means an area of land that a municipality has defined by law, rule, or ordinance to allow manufacturing facilities. new text end new text begin (e) "Manufacturing facilities" means facilities used for the manufacturing, compounding, processing, packaging, treatment, or assembly of products and materials that may or may not emit objectionable or offensive noise, odor, dust, vibration, or other discharge, emission, or effect beyond the lot on which the use is located. Such uses include but are not limited to sawmills; refineries; commercial feedlots; acid; cement; explosives; flour, feed, and grain milling or storage; meatpacking and slaughter houses; coal or tar asphalt distillation; rendering of fat, grease, lard, or tallow; alcoholic beverages; poisons; exterminating agents; glue or size; lime; gypsum; plaster of paris; tanneries; automobile parts; paper and paper products; glass chemicals, crude oil, and petroleum products, including storage; electric power generation facilities; vinegar works; junkyard; auto reduction yard; foundry forge; casting metal products; rock, stone, and cement products; lumberyards; machine shops; products assembly; sheet metal shops; plastics; electronics; general nonalcoholic beverages; signs and displays; printing; publishing; fabricated metal parts; appliances; clothing; textiles; and used auto parts. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Limitation on data center siting. new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), a municipality must not allow the development of an enterprise data center in any zoning district. new text end new text begin (b) A municipality may allow an enterprise data center as a conditional use in an industrial district. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective June 20, 2025, and applies to enterprise data centers constructed on or after that date. new text end